Washington statutes.
RCW 19.52.170

Chapter not applicable to certain loans from tax-qualified retirement plan.

This chapter does not apply to any loan permitted under applicable federal law and regulations from a tax-qualified retirement plan to a person then a participant or a beneficiary under the plan.

This section affects loans being made, negotiated, renegotiated, extended, renewed, or revised on or after April 20, 1989.

[ 1989 c 138 s 1.]